Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2201
Act, how cited.

Sections 13-2201 to 13-2204 shall be known and may be cited as the Local Government Miscellaneous Expenditure Act.

Laws 1993, LB 734, § 9.